Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-323.01
Domestic corporation administratively dissolved; reinstatement; application;
procedure; payment required.

(1) A corporation administratively dissolved under section 21-323
may apply to the Secretary of State for reinstatement within five years after
the effective date of its administrative dissolution.
The application shall:

(a) Recite the name of the corporation and the effective date of its administrative dissolution;

(b) State that the ground or grounds for dissolution either did not
exist or have been eliminated;

(c) State that the corporation's name satisfies the requirements of
section 21-230; and

(d) Be accompanied by a fee in the amount prescribed in section 21-205, as such section may from time to time
be amended, for an application for reinstatement.

(2) If the Secretary of State determines (a) that the application contains
the information required by subsection (1) of this section and that the information
is correct and (b) that the corporation has complied with subsection (4) of
this section, he or she shall cancel the certificate of dissolution, prepare
a certificate of reinstatement that recites his or her determination and the
effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate, and
serve a copy on the corporation under section 21-236.

(3) When the reinstatement is effective, it shall relate back to and
take effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution
and the corporation shall resume carrying on its business as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

(4) A corporation applying for reinstatement under this section shall:

(a)(i) Pay to the Secretary of State a sum equal to all occupation taxes
delinquent at the time the corporation was administratively dissolved,
plus a sum equal to all occupation taxes which would otherwise have been due
for the years the corporation was administratively dissolved and (ii) deliver to
the Secretary of State a properly executed and signed biennial report for
the most recent even-numbered year; and

(b) Pay to the Secretary of State an additional amount derived by multiplying
the rate specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time
be adjusted, times the amount of occupation taxes required to be paid by it
for each year that such corporation was administratively dissolved.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 198;

Laws 1996, LB 1036, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 524, § 12;

Laws 2012, LB854, § 2;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 254.
January 1, 2017